Missouri, session 2026, SB1412.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 407, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 407.3405, to read as
follows:
407.3405. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Age verification", a method by which a commercial
entity verifies the age of an individual by requiring the
individual to:
(a) Provide digital identification; or
(b) Comply with a commercial age verification system
that verifies age using:
a. Government-issued identification; or
b. A commercially reasonable method that relies on
public or private transactional data to verify the age of an
individual;
(2) "Commercial entity", a corporation, limited
liability company, partnership, limited partnership, sole
proprietorship, or other legally recognized business entity;

SB 1412 2
(3) "Digital identification", information stored on a
digital network that may be accessed by a commercial entity
and that serves as proof of the identity of an individual;
(4) "Distribute", to issue, sell, give, provide,
deliver, transfer, transmute, circulate, or disseminate by
any means;
(5) "Minor", an individual younger than eighteen years
of age;
(6) "News-gathering organization":
(a) An employee of a newspaper, news publication, or
news source, printed or on an online or mobile platform, of
current news and public interest, who is acting within the
course and scope of that employment and can provide
documentation of that employment with the newspaper, news
publication, or news source; and
(b) An employee of a radio broadcast station,
television broadcast station, cable television operator, or
wire service who is acting within the course and scope of
that employment and can provide documentation of that
employment;
(7) "Publish", to communicate or make information
available to another person or entity on a publicly
available internet website;
(8) "Sexual material harmful to minors", any material
that:
(a) The average person applying contemporary community
standards would find, taking the material as a whole and
with respect to minors, that it is designed to appeal to or
pander to the prurient interest; or
(b) In a manner patently offensive with respect to
minors, exploits, is devoted to, or principally consists of

SB 1412 3
descriptions of actual, simulated, or animated displays or
depictions of:
a. A person's pubic hair, anus, or genitals or the
nipple of the female breast;
b. Touching, caressing, or fondling of nipples,
breasts, buttocks, anuses, or genitals; or
c. Sexual intercourse, masturbation, sodomy,
bestiality, oral copulation, flagellation, excretory
functions, exhibitions, or any other sexual act; and
(c) Taken as a whole, lacks serious literary,
artistic, political, or scientific value for minors;
(9) "Transactional data", a sequence of information
that documents an exchange, agreement, or transfer between
an individual, commercial entity, or third party used for
the purpose of satisfying a request or event. "Transactional
data" includes records from mortgage, education, and
employment entities.
2. A commercial entity that knowingly and
intentionally publishes or distributes material on an
internet website, including a social media platform, more
than one-third of which is sexual material harmful to
minors, shall use reasonable age verification methods to
verify that an individual attempting to access the material
is eighteen years of age or older.
3. A commercial entity that performs the age
verification or a third party that performs the age
verification under this section shall not retain any
identifying information of the individual.
4. A commercial entity required to use reasonable age
verification methods under this section shall:
(1) Display the following notices on its website and
all advertisements for the website on which sexual material

SB 1412 4
harmful to minors is published or distributed in a fourteen-
point font or larger:
"(a) Pornography is potentially biologically
addictive, is proven to harm human brain
development, desensitizes brain reward circuits,
increases conditioned responses, and weakens brain
function;
(b) Exposure to this content is associated with
low self-esteem and body image, eating disorders,
impaired brain development, and other emotional and
mental illnesses; and
(c) Pornography increases the demand for
prostitution, child exploitation, and child
pornography."; and
(2) Display the following notice at the bottom of
every page on the commercial entity's website in a fourteen-
point font or larger:
"U.S. SUBSTANCE ABUSE AND MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES
ADMINISTRATION. THIS HELPLINE IS A FREE,
CONFIDENTIAL INFORMATION SERVICE (IN ENGLISH OR
SPANISH) OPEN 24 HOURS PER DAY, FOR INDIVIDUALS AND
100 FAMILY MEMBERS FACING MENTAL HEALTH OR SUBSTANCE
101 USE DISORDERS. THE SERVICE PROVIDES REFERRAL TO
102 LOCAL TREATMENT FACILITIES, SUPPORT GROUPS, AND
103 COMMUNITY-BASED ORGANIZATIONS.";
104 5. This section shall not apply to a bona fide news or
105 public interest broadcast, website video, report, or event
106 and shall not be construed to affect the rights of a news-
107 gathering organization.
108 6. An internet service provider, or its affiliates or
109 subsidiaries, a search engine, or a cloud service provider

SB 1412 5
110 shall not be held to have violated provisions of this
111 section solely for providing access or connection to or from
112 a website or other information or content on the internet or
113 on a facility, system, or network not under that provider's
114 control, including transmission, downloading, intermediate
115 storage, access software, or other services to the extent
116 the provider or search engine is not responsible for the
117 creation of the content that constitutes sexual material
118 harmful to minors.
119 7. The attorney general shall enforce provisions of
120 this section. If the attorney general believes that a
121 commercial entity is knowingly violating or has knowingly
122 violated provisions of this section and the action is in the
123 public interest, the attorney general may bring an action in
124 a court of competent jurisdiction. If the court finds that
125 a violation occurred, the court may grant damages,
126 injunctive relief, civil penalties, court costs and
127 reasonable attorney fees, and any such other relief the
128 court finds appropriate. Civil penalties shall be as
129 follows:
130 (1) Ten thousand dollars per day that a commercial
131 entity operates a website in violation of the age
132 verification requirements under this section;
133 (2) Ten thousand dollars per instance when a
134 commercial entity retains identifying information in
135 violation of this section; and
136 (3) An additional amount of not more than two hundred
137 fifty thousand dollars if one or more minors accessed sexual
138 material harmful to minors in violation of the age
139 verification requirements under this section.
✓